West Virginia, session 2025, HB3209.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION. §18-5-18b. School counselors in public schools. (a) A school counselor means a professional educator who holds a valid school counselor's certificate in accordance with §18A-1-1 of this code. (b) Each county board shall provide counseling services for each pupil enrolled in the public schools of the county. (c) The school counselor shall work with individual pupils and groups of pupils in providing developmental, preventive and remedial guidance and counseling programs to meet academic, social, emotional, and physical needs; including programs to identify and address the problem of potential school dropouts. The school counselor also may provide consultant services for parents, teachers, and administrators and may use outside referral services, when appropriate, if no additional cost is incurred by the county board.(d) The state board may adopt rules consistent with the provisions of this section that define the role of a school counselor based on the "National Standards for School Counseling Programs" of the American School Counselor Association. A school counselor is authorized to perform such services as are not inconsistent with the provisions of the rule as adopted by the state board. To the extent that any funds are made available for this purpose, county boards shall provide training for counselors and administrators to implement the rule as adopted by the state board.(e) Each county board shall develop a comprehensive drop-out prevention program utilizing the expertise of school counselors and any other appropriate resources available.(f) School counselors shall be full-time professional personnel, shall spend at least 80 percent of work time in a direct counseling relationship with pupils, and shall devote no more than 20 percent of the workday to administrative activities: Provided, That such activities are directly related to their counseling duties: Provided further, That school counselors may not perform the following duties without a written agreement:(1) Administering cognitive, aptitude, and achievement testing programs: Provided, That school counselors may administer make up tests and any tests that are required for virtual students, should no other person be available to administer the test; (2) Routinely signing excuses for students who are tardy or absent; (3) Performing disciplinary actions or assigning discipline consequences; (4) Routinely covering classes when teachers are absent or to create teacher planning time;(5) Maintaining student records: Provided, That school counselors may have access to student records; (6) Computing grade-point averages: Provided, That school counselors may compute grade-point averages for the purpose of determining a student’s eligibility for scholarships or post-secondary goals; (7) Routinely supervising classrooms or common areas;(8) Keeping clerical records: Provided, That school counselors may access clerical records; (9) Coordinating Individual Education Plans: Provided, That this does not preclude school counselors from otherwise participating in Individual Education Plans when appropriate;(10) Coordinating 504 Plans: Provided, That this does not preclude school counselors from otherwise participating in 504 Plans when appropriate; and(11) Coordinating Student Assistance Teams: Provided, That this does not preclude school counselors from otherwise participating in Student Study Teams when appropriate.(g) Beginning with the 2024—25 school year, school counselors shall participate in the training set forth below. (1) At least once every two years, school counselors serving students in grades Pre-K through 12 shall participate in the School Counselors Conference, which shall address the following components:(A) Career Counseling and Life Planning;(B)  Career awareness; (C) Career and life planning;(D) Career and life success;(E) Opportunities with Career Technical Education available in West Virginia; (F) Post secondary options;(G) Academic Counseling and Personalized Planning;(H) Academic motivation; (I) Goal setting;(J) Academic scheduling;(K) Personalized Education Plans;(L) Dual credit; (M) Learning skills;(N)  Personal and Social Counseling;(O) Decision making;(P) Personal responsibility; (Q) Conflict resolution; and (R) Prevention.(2) Every two years, school counselors serving students in grades seven through 12 shall receive training regarding building and trades and apprenticeship programs available to students in West Virginia. This training shall be administered by the department of education and provided at no cost to the counselors.(h) Beginning August 1, 2025, each county shall employ two school counselors to each 1000 students to net enrollment: Provided, That this requirement may not be construed to increase the number of eligible professional student support personnel positions to each 1,000 students in net enrollment for which an allowance is required under subdivision (1), subsection (b) of §18-9A-8 of this code. The counties may follow the ratio of one counselor to every 400-450 students in elementary and middle school and one counselor to every 250-300 students in high school. (i) Nothing in this section prohibits a county board from exceeding the provisions of this section, or requires any specific level of funding by the Legislature. The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect July 1, 2025.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2025.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home